Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-409
Sections; how construed.

Nothing in sections 69-401 to 69-409 shall be construed to abrogate
or affect the provisions of any lawful rule, regulation, resolution, ordinance,
or statute which is more restrictive than sections 69-401 to 69-409.

Laws 2008, LB766, § 9;

Laws 2012, LB1049, § 6.